Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) The America 250 Oregon Commission is established, consisting of 27
members appointed as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2)(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members  from among
members of the Senate, one from the majority party and one from the minority party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives,  one from the majority party and one
from the minority party.
(c) The Governor shall appoint 13 voting members as follows:
(A) One member representing the Oregon Heritage Commission.
(B) One member representing the Oregon Arts Commission.
(C) One member representing the Trust for Cultural Development Board.
(D) One member representing the Commission on Black Affairs.
(E) One member representing the Commission on Asian and Pacific Islander Affairs.
(F) One member representing the Commission on Hispanic Affairs.
(G) One member representing the Commission for Women.
(H) Six members representing the public at large.
(d) The following 10 voting members shall serve ex officio:
(A) The Executive Director of the Oregon Historical  Society or the executive director’s
designee.
(B) The State Treasurer or the treasurer’s designee.
(C) The Secretary of State or the secretary’s designee.
(D) The  Deputy Superintendent of Public Instruction or the deputy superintendent’s
designee.
(E) The State Parks and Recreation Director or the director’s designee.
(F) The Director of the Oregon Business Development Department  or the director’s
designee.
(G) The executive director  of the Oregon Tourism Commission or the executive director’s
designee.
(H) The Director of Veterans’ Affairs or the director’s designee.
(I) The Governor’s director of tribal affairs or the director’s designee.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1531 (SB 1531-A) Page 1
(J) The Executive Officer of the Commission on Indian Services or  the executive officer’s
designee.
(e) The America 250 Oregon  Commission may by majority vote invite additional individ-
uals to serve as nonvoting honorary members of the commission.
(f) If there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing  authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective.
(3) The commission shall:
(a) Coordinate and provide guidance for Oregon’s  official observance of the 250th anni-
versary of the establishment of the United States,  as marked by the Declaration of Inde-
pendence in 1776.
(b) Consult with the nine  federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon when planning and
developing activities throughout the state in order to meaningfully include Oregon’s  tribal
history.
(c) Seek to ensure an official observance that is inclusive and shares the histories  of
Oregon’s diverse populations, including the histories of  the Native American peoples who
have an ancestral and tradition connection to this state.
(4) The commission may:
(a) Adopt rules necessary for the operation of the commission;
(b) Cooperate with national, regional, state, local and Native American organizations,
institutions, bodies and other public or private entities that are promoting the
semiquincentennial;
(c) Plan, conduct and assist with semiquincentennial events;
(d) Plan, support and produce educational resources and programs related to  the
semiquincentennial;
(e) Engage in and encourage fundraising activities, including, but not limited  to, the so-
licitation of charitable gifts, grants or donations;
(f) Coordinate interagency participation in the observance;
(g) Create subcommittees of  the commission comprising members of the commission,
members appointed from the public at  large and honorary members to further the goals of
the commission; and
(h) Engage in any other activity related to the powers and duties  conferred on the com-
mission under this section.
(5) The commission shall  meet at times and places specified by the call of the chairperson
or of a majority of the voting members of the commission.
(6) A majority of the voting members of the  commission constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(7) Official action by the  commission requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the commission.
(8) The Executive Director of  the Oregon Historical Society or the executive director’s
designee shall serve as chairperson.
(9) The Oregon Historical Society shall:
(a) Provide staff support to the commission.
(b) Direct and supervise the budgeting, recordkeeping, reporting  and related administra-
tive and clerical functions of the commission.
(c) Print and disseminate for the commission any required  notices, rules or orders
adopted by the commission.
(d) Expend and allocate any  appropriations authorized by the Legislative Assembly to
carry out the purposes of this section.
(e) Collect all revenues other than those appropriated  by the Legislative Assembly and
use them for the purposes of this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1531 (SB 1531-A) Page 2
(10) The Oregon Historical Society may  employ personnel, contract for services and re-
ceive, expend and allocate the proceeds of gifts, grants and donations  on behalf of the com-
mission for the purposes of this section.
(11) Voting members of the commission are entitled to  compensation and expenses as
provided in ORS 292.495.
(12) All agencies of state government, as defined  in ORS 174.111, are directed to assist
the commission in the performance of the duties of the commission and, to the extent  per-
mitted by laws relating to confidentiality, to furnish  information and advice that the mem-
bers of the commission consider necessary to perform their duties.
(13) No later than  September 15 of each year, the commission shall submit a report in
the manner provided by  ORS 192.245 to the interim committees of the Legislative Assembly
related to historical  commemorations. The report may include recommendations for legis-
lation.
SECTION 1a. Section 1b of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 172.100 to
172.140.
SECTION 1b. (1) The America  250 Oregon Subcommittee is established within the Com-
mission on Indian Services.
(2) The purpose of the subcommittee is to provide coordination and guidance to  the
America 250 Oregon Commission established under section 1 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The subcommittee shall consist of 10 members as follows:
(a) The Executive Officer of the Commission on Indian Services shall appoint the fol-
lowing nine voting members:
(A) One member representing the Burns-Paiute Tribe.
(B) One member representing the Confederated Coos, Lower Umpqua  and Siuslaw Tribes.
(C) One member representing the Confederated Tribes of the Grand Ronde.
(D) One member representing the Confederated Tribes of Siletz Indians of Oregon.
(E) One member representing the Confederated  Tribes of the Umatilla Indian Reserva-
tion.
(F) One member representing the Confederated  Tribes of the Warm Springs Indian Res-
ervation.
(G) One member representing the Coquille Tribe.
(H) One member representing the Cow Creek Band of Umpqua Indians.
(I) One member representing the Klamath Tribe.
(b) One nonvoting member  who is the Executive Officer of the Commission on Indian
Services or the  executive officer’s designee serving ex officio on the America 250 Oregon
Commission under section 1 (2)(d)(J) of this 2024 Act.
(4) If there is a vacancy for  any cause, the executive officer shall make an appointment
to become immediately effective.
(5) The role of the nonvoting member described in subsection (3)(b) of this section is to:
(a) Serve as the liaison of the subcommittee to the America 250 Oregon Commission.
(b) Communicate the positions of  the nine federally recognized Indian tribes in Oregon
to the America 250 Oregon Commission in order to uplift the tribes’ histories and stories.
(6) The subcommittee may elect one of its members to serve as chairperson.
(7) The subcommittee shall meet at times and places specified by the call of the chair-
person or a majority of the voting members of the subcommittee.
(8) A majority of the voting members of the subcommittee constitutes a quorum for the
transaction of business.
(9) Official action  by the subcommittee requires the approval of a majority of the voting
members of the subcommittee.
(10) The subcommittee may adopt rules necessary for  the operation of the subcommittee.
SECTION 2.
Sections 1 and 1b of this 2024 Act are repealed on January 2, 2028.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1531 (SB 1531-A) Page 3
SECTION 3. There is appropriated to the Oregon Department of Administrative  Services,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2025, out of  the General Fund, the amount of $250,000, to
be transferred to the Oregon Historical Society for the purpose of carrying  out the pro-
visions of section 1 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 4. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate February 28, 2024
Repassed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1531 (SB 1531-A) Page 4